Washington statutes.
RCW 7.60.190

Participation of creditors and parties in interest in receivership proceeding—Effect of court orders on nonparties.

(1) Creditors and parties in interest to whom written notice of the pendency of the receivership is given in accordance with RCW 7.60.210, and creditors or other persons submitting written claims in the receivership or otherwise appearing and participating in the receivership, are bound by the acts of the receiver with regard to management and disposition of estate property whether or not they are formally joined as parties.

(2) Any person having a claim against or interest in any estate property or in the receivership proceedings may appear in the receivership, either in person or by an attorney. Appearance must be made by filing a written notice of appearance, including the name and mailing address of the party in interest, and the name and address of the person's attorney, if any, with the clerk, and by serving a copy of the notice upon the receiver and the receiver's attorney of record, if any. The receiver shall maintain a master mailing list of all persons joined as parties in the receivership and of all persons serving and filing notices of appearance in the receivership in accordance with this section. A creditor or other party in interest has a right to be heard with respect to all matters affecting the person, whether or not the person is joined as a party to the action.

(3) Any request for relief against a state agency shall be mailed to or otherwise served on the agency and on the office of the attorney general.

(4) Orders of the court with respect to the treatment of claims and disposition of estate property, including but not limited to orders providing for sales of property free and clear of liens, are effective as to any person having a claim against or interest in the receivership estate and who has actual knowledge of the receivership, whether or not the person receives written notice from the receiver and whether or not the person appears or participates in the receivership.

(5) The receiver shall give not less than ten days' written notice by mail of any examination by the receiver of the person with respect to whose property the receiver has been appointed and to persons who serve and file an appearance in the proceeding.

(6) Persons on the master mailing list are entitled to not less than thirty days' written notice of the hearing of any motion or other proceeding involving any proposed:

(a) Allowance or disallowance of any claim or claims;

(b) Abandonment, disposition, or distribution of estate property, other than an emergency disposition of property subject to eroding value or a disposition of property in the ordinary course of business;

(c) Compromise or settlement of a controversy that might affect the distribution to creditors from the estate;

(d) Compensation of the receiver or any professional employed by the receiver; or

(e) Application for termination of the receivership or discharge of the receiver. Notice of the application shall also be sent to state taxing and applicable regulatory agencies.

Any opposition to any motion to authorize any of the actions under (a) through (e) of this subsection must be filed and served upon the receiver and the receiver's attorney, if any, at least three days before the date of the proposed action. Persons on the master mailing list shall be served with all pleadings or in opposition to any motion. The court may require notice to be given to persons on the master mailing list of additional matters the court deems appropriate. The receiver shall make a copy of the current master mailing list available to any person on that list upon the person's request.

(7) All persons duly notified by the receiver of any hearing to approve or authorize an action or a proposed action by the receiver is bound by any order of the court with respect to the action, whether or not the persons have appeared or objected to the action or proposed action or have been joined formally as parties to the particular action.

(8) Whenever notice is not specifically required to be given under this chapter, the court may consider motions and grant or deny relief without notice or hearing, if it appears that no person joined as a party or who has appeared in the receivership would be prejudiced or harmed by the relief requested.

[ 2011 c 34 s 6; 2004 c 165 s 21.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.